Hawaii statutes.
[§658A-5] Application for judicial relief.
(a) Except as otherwise provided in section 658A-28, an application for
judicial relief under this chapter shall be made by motion to the court and
heard in the manner provided by law or rule of court for making and hearing
motions.

(b) Unless a civil action involving the
agreement to arbitrate is pending, notice of an initial motion to the court
under this chapter shall be served in the manner provided by law for the
service of a summons in a civil action. Otherwise, notice of the motion shall
be given in the manner provided by law or rule of court for serving motions in
pending cases. [L 2001, c 265, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next